Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 77.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not, nor shall an agent or employee of a person, nor shall a person as agent or employee of
another, discharge into the atmosphere from any single source of emission whatsoever, any air contaminant in
quantities and for a period or periods in excess of applicable emission standards established by regulation by
the air pollution control board. Exceeding these standards shall constitute a rebuttable presumption of violation
of this section.
(2) A person shall not, nor shall an agent or employee of a person, nor shall a person as agent or employee of
another, discharge from any source whatsoever such quantities of air contaminants or other material which
cause injury, detriment, nuisance, or annoyance to any considerable number of persons or to the public or
which endanger the comfort, repose, health, or safety of any such persons or the public or which cause or have
a natural tendency to cause injury or damage to business or property. The board shall have power, by
regulation, to fix reasonable limits, by weight or otherwise, for particular air contaminants or other material
which in the opinion of said board may cause or have tendency to cause injury, detriment, nuisance, or
annoyance to any considerable number of persons or to the public. Exceeding such limits shall be a rebuttable
presumption of violation of this section.
(3) (a) For purposes of enforcing compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter, the
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, or any requirement of the federal Clean Air Act,
42 U.S.C. sec. 7401 et seq., for which the air pollution control board has primary enforcement
authority, an enforcement action alleging violations or noncompliance shall be based on:
1. A data collection method, emissions test, or monitoring method that has been approved or
promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or
2. A method or test that produces scientifically defensible and quality-assured data that is
accepted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for enforcement purposes.
(b) Any data collected using a method that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not be admissible or considered in any enforcement proceeding initiated by the air
pollution control board, an air pollution control officer, or a private citizen.
Section 2. KRS 77.160 is amended to read as follows:
The provisions of KRS 77.155(1) and (2) shall not be applicable:
(1) To buildings used exclusively for single owner-occupied private residences. However, the provisions of KRS
77.155 shall be fully effective and applicable if a renovation, demolition, or cleanup of a building may cause a
disturbance of asbestos material and:
(a) The building is one (1) of a group of buildings consisting of more than one (1) building under common
control; or
(b) At the time of the renovation, demolition, or cleanup, the use of the building or the property is
commercial or is not known. To all larger residential buildings of whatever type, KRS 77.155 shall be
effective and applicable;
(2) When a firebox, furnace, boiler, locomotive, or other fuel-consuming device is being cleaned out and a new
fire is being built therein, in which event a smoke of a density as great or greater than that established by
regulation by the air pollution control board shall be permitted for a period not to exceed six (6) minutes in any
single period of sixty (60) minutes;
(3) To equipment used for agricultural operations in the growing of crops, or raising of fowl or animals;
(4) To smoke from fires set by or permitted by any public officer if such fire is set or permission given in the
performance of the official duty of such officer for the purpose of weed abatement, the prevention of a fire or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
health hazard, or the instruction of public employees in the methods of fighting fire, which is, in the opinion of
such officer, necessary.
Section 3. KRS 224.20-110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall, directly or indirectly, emit into or discharge into the air under the jurisdiction of the
Commonwealth, or cause, permit, or allow to be emitted or discharged into such air any contaminants as
provided for in subsection (1) of KRS 224.1-010 that shall cause or contribute to the pollution of the air of the
Commonwealth in contravention of the emission standards or the ambient air standards adopted by the cabinet,
or in contravention of any of the rules, regulations, or orders of the cabinet, or in contravention of any of the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) (a) For purposes of enforcing compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter, the
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, or any requirement of the federal Clean Air Act,
42 U.S.C. sec. 7401 et seq., for which the cabinet has primary enforcement authority, an enforcement
action alleging violations or noncompliance shall be based on:
1. A data collection method, emissions test, or monitoring method that has been approved or
promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or
2. A method or test that produces scientifically defensible and quality-assured data that is
accepted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for enforcement purposes.
(b) Any data collected using a method that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not be admissible or considered in any enforcement proceeding initiated by the
cabinet or a private citizen.
(3) For the purpose of fostering willing compliance with the emission standards and the ambient air standards
adopted by the cabinet, the cabinet shall promulgate and implement administrative regulations which give
effect to 42 U.S.C. sec.[ Section] 7412(i)(5)[ of Title 42, United States Code], relating to alternative emission
limitations allowed for early reduction of emissions. The program established by this subsection shall be
conducted strictly in accordance with the federal law.
Became law without Governor's signature March 25, 2025.